Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1299.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that predetermined on-site parking requirements needlessly drive up the cost of development, particularly housing; discourage walking and multimodal transit usage; and encourage excessive reliance of automobiles with attendant impacts on human health and greenhouse gas emissions. The legislature further finds that the amount of parking that a project actually needs should be determined on a case-by-case basis by permit applicants sensitive to actual market conditions rather than a one-size-fits-all regulation.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:(1) A city may not require more than 0.5 parking space per residential dwelling unit.(2) A city may not require more than one parking space per 1,000 feet of commercial space.(3) A city may not require any minimum parking requirements for:(a) Existing buildings undergoing change of use, including vacant buildings;(b) Residences under 1,200 square feet;(c) Commercial spaces under 5,000 square feet;(d) Affordable housing;(e) Senior housing;(f) Housing for people with disabilities;(g) Facilities that serve alcohol;(h) Child care facilities;(i) Commercial spaces in mixed-use projects.(4) For purposes of this section, "affordable housing" has the same meaning as in RCW 36.70A.030.(5) This section does not apply to accessible parking spaces in compliance with the Americans with disabilities act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW to read as follows:(1) A code city may not require more than one parking space per residential dwelling unit.(2) A code city may not require more than one parking space per 1,000 feet of commercial space.(3) A code city may not require any minimum parking requirements for:(a) Existing buildings undergoing change of use, including vacant buildings;(b) Residences under 1,200 square feet;(c) Commercial spaces under 5,000 square feet;(d) Affordable housing;(e) Senior housing;(f) Housing for people with disabilities;(g) Facilities that serve alcohol;(h) Child care facilities;(i) Commercial spaces in mixed-use projects.(4) For purposes of this section, "affordable housing" has the same meaning as in RCW 36.70A.030.(5) This section does not apply to accessible parking spaces in compliance with the Americans with disabilities act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW to read as follows:(1) A county may not require more than 0.5 parking space per residential dwelling unit.(2) A county may not require more than one parking space per 1,000 feet of commercial space.(3) A county may not require any minimum parking requirements for:(a) Existing buildings undergoing change of use, including vacant buildings;(b) Residences under 1,200 square feet;(c) Commercial spaces under 5,000 square feet;(d) Affordable housing;(e) Senior housing;(f) Housing for people with disabilities;(g) Facilities that serve alcohol;(h) Child care facilities;(i) Commercial spaces in mixed-use projects.(4) For purposes of this section, "affordable housing" has the same meaning as in RCW 36.70A.030.(5) This section does not apply to accessible parking spaces in compliance with the Americans with disabilities act.Sec. 5. RCW 36.70A.620 and 2020 c 173 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:In counties and cities planning under RCW 36.70A.040, minimum residential parking requirements mandated by municipal zoning ordinances for housing units constructed after July 1, 2019, are subject to the following ((requirements)):(((1) For housing units that are affordable to very low-income or extremely low-income individuals and that are located within one-quarter mile of a transit stop that receives transit service at least two times per hour for twelve or more hours per day, minimum residential parking requirements may be no greater than one parking space per bedroom or .75 space per unit. A city may require a developer to record a covenant that prohibits the rental of a unit subject to this parking restriction for any purpose other than providing for housing for very low-income or extremely low-income individuals. The covenant must address price restrictions and household income limits and policies if the property is converted to a use other than for low-income housing. A city may establish a requirement for the provision of more than one parking space per bedroom or .75 space per unit if the jurisdiction has determined a particular housing unit to be in an area with a lack of access to street parking capacity, physical space impediments, or other reasons supported by evidence that would make on-street parking infeasible for the unit.(2) For housing units that are specifically for seniors or people with disabilities, that are located within one-quarter mile of a transit stop that receives transit service at least four times per hour for twelve or more hours per day, a city may not impose minimum residential parking requirements for the residents of such housing units, subject to the exceptions provided in this subsection. A city may establish parking requirements for staff and visitors of such housing units. A city may establish a requirement for the provision of one or more parking space per bedroom if the jurisdiction has determined a particular housing unit to be in an area with a lack of access to street parking capacity, physical space impediments, or other reasons supported by evidence that would make on-street parking infeasible for the unit. A city may require a developer to record a covenant that prohibits the rental of a unit subject to this parking restriction for any purpose other than providing for housing for seniors or people with disabilities.(3) For market rate multifamily housing units that are located within one-quarter mile of a transit stop that receives transit service from at least one route that provides service at least four times per hour for twelve or more hours per day, minimum residential parking requirements may be no greater than one parking space per bedroom or .75 space per unit. A city or county may establish a requirement for the provision of more than one parking space per bedroom or .75 space per unit if the jurisdiction has determined a particular housing unit to be in an area with a lack of access to street parking capacity, physical space impediments, or other reasons supported by evidence that would make on-street parking infeasible for the unit))Cities with a population of at least 10,000 that are within a county with a population density exceeding 100 people per square mile may not require off-street parking as a condition of permitting development of multifamily, middle housing, or accessory dwelling units that are located within one-half mile walking distance of transit service. For the purposes of this section, transit service means at least one route that provides service at least four times per hour for 12 or more hours per day. Nothing in this section precludes a city from adopting maximum parking limits or requiring frontage improvements to provide on-street parking.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. This act may be known and cited as the parking reform and modernization act.--- END ---